apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="ਲ/ੈ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂਗਾ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋਗੇ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋਗੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗਾ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਗੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਰਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਣਾ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਣੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਣ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੂੰ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਓ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੋ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂਦਾ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂਦੇ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂਦੀ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੈਂਦੀਆਂ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਕਰ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ੇਕੇ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਏ</l><r>ੈ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਈ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਈਆਂ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਲੈ"><i>ਲ</i><par n="ਲ/ੈ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਾਹ ਲੈ"><i>ਸਾਹ<b/>ਲ</i><par n="ਲ/ੈ__vblex_tv"/></e>
